Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-385
Application; situs.

Every owner of a motor vehicle or trailer required to be registered shall make application for registration to the county treasurer of the county in which the motor vehicle or trailer has situs. The application shall be by any means designated by the department. An approved licensed dealer participating in the electronic dealer services system pursuant to section 60-1507 may submit such application electronically to the appropriate county treasurer or the department. A salvage branded certificate of title and a nontransferable certificate of title provided for in section 60-170 shall not be valid for registration purposes.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 85;

Laws 2006, LB 765, § 6;

Laws 2007, LB286, § 33;

Laws 2012, LB801, § 57;

Laws 2017, LB263, § 30.